Louisiana, session 2026, SB508.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:868(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§868. Limiting actions; jurisdiction; venue
* * *
B. No insurance contract delivered or issued for delivery in this state and
covering subjects located, resident, or to be performed in this state, or any health and
accident policy insuring a resident of this state regardless of where made or
delivered, shall contain any condition, stipulation, or agreement limiting right of
action against the insurer to a period of less than twenty-four months next after the
inception of the loss when the claim is a first-party claim, as defined in R.S. 22:1692,
and arises under any insurance classified and defined in R.S. 22:47(6), (10), (11),
(12), (13), (15), and (19) or to a period of less than one year from the time when the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1419 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 508
cause of action accrues in connection with all other insurances unless otherwise
specifically provided in this Code. Any payment by an insurer under the terms
and conditions of its contract shall not be considered the acknowledgment of a
debt or otherwise extend the contractually defined prescriptive period which
begins to run at the inception of the loss.
* * *